Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-746
Bail; forfeiture; effect.

If the prisoner is admitted to bail, and fails to appear and surrender himself according to the conditions of his bond, the judge, or magistrate by proper order, shall declare the bond forfeited and order his immediate arrest without warrant if he be within this state. Recovery may be had on such bond in the name of the state as in the case of other bonds given by the accused in criminal proceedings within this state.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 18, p. 564.